test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alme_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - alme: # ok ALGE
    alme+N+Sg+Nom:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Gen:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Acc:  alme
    alme+N+Sg+Ill:  aalman
    alme+N+Sg+Loc:  almeest
    alme+N+Sg+Com:  olmijn
    alme+N+Sg+Abe:  almettáá
    alme+N+Ess:  almen
    alme+N+Par:  almed
    alme+N+Pl+Nom:  almeh
    alme+N+Pl+Gen:  [oolmij, olmij]
    alme+N+Pl+Acc:  oolmijd 
    alme+N+Pl+Ill:  [oolmijd, olmijd] # oolmijd hardcoded
    alme+N+Pl+Loc:  oolmijn
    alme+N+Pl+Com:  [olmijguin, olmijgijn]
    alme+N+Pl+Abe:  olmijttáá
